Alabama, session 2026rs, SB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB345 INTRODUCED
29 Section 1. Section 2 of Act 2025-136, 2025 Regular
30 Session, now appearing as Sections 27-45A-3 and 27-45A-10,
31 Code of Alabama 1975, and Section 3 of Act 2025-136, 2025
32 Regular Session, now appearing as 27-45A-13, Code of Alabama
33 1975, are amended to read as follows:
34 "§27-45A-3
35 For purposes of this chapter, the following words have
36 the following meanings:
37 (1) AFFILIATE or PBM AFFILIATE. An entity, including,
38 but not limited to, a pharmacy, health insurer, or group
39 purchasing organization that directly or indirectly, through
40 one or more intermediaries, has one of the following
41 affiliations:
42 a. Owns, controls, or has an investment interest in a
43 pharmacy benefits manager.
44 b. Is owned, controlled by, or has an investment
45 interest holder who is a pharmacy benefits manager.
46 c. Is under common ownership or corporate control with
47 a pharmacy benefits manager.
48 (2) CLAIMS PROCESSING SERVICES. The administrative
49 services performed in connection with the processing and
50 adjudicating of claims relating to pharmacist services that
51 include any of the following:
52 a. Receiving payments for pharmacist services.
53 b. Making payments to pharmacists or pharmacies for
54 pharmacist services.
55 c. Both paragraphs a. and b.
56 (3) COVERED INDIVIDUAL. A member, policyholder,
Page 2

(3) COVERED INDIVIDUAL. A member, policyholder,
SB345 INTRODUCED
57 subscriber, enrollee, beneficiary, dependent, or other
58 individual participating in a health benefit plan.
59 (4) HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN. A policy, contract,
60 certificate, or agreement entered into, offered, or issued by
61 a health insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
62 reimburse any of the costs of physical, mental, or behavioral
63 health care services, including pharmaceutical services.
64 (5) HEALTH INSURER. An entity subject to the insurance
65 laws of this state and rules of the department, or subject to
66 the jurisdiction of the department, that contracts or offers
67 to contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or
68 reimburse any of the costs of health care services, including,
69 but not limited to, a sickness and accident insurance company,
70 a health maintenance organization operating pursuant to
71 Chapter 21A, a nonprofit hospital or health service
72 corporation, a health care service plan organized pursuant to
73 Article 6, Chapter 20 of Title 10A, or any other entity
74 providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or
75 health services, including a nonprofit agricultural
76 organization that provides a plan for health care services to
77 its members.
78 (6) INDEPENDENT PHARMACY. A pharmacy as defined in
79 Section 34-23-1 located in the state which holds an active
80 permit from the Alabama State Board of Pharmacy and is
81 classified by the Alabama State Board of Pharmacy as a
82 community pharmacy.
83 (7) IN-NETWORK or NETWORK. A network of pharmacists or
84 pharmacies that are paid for pharmacist services pursuant to
Page 3

pharmacies that are paid for pharmacist services pursuant to
SB345 INTRODUCED
85 an agreement with a health benefit plan or a pharmacy benefits
86 manager.
87 (8)(7) MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT RATE. The total payment
88 amount for an outpatient drug dispensed by a pharmacy as set
89 by rule adopted by the Alabama Medicaid Agency which is in
90 effect on April 15, 2025.
91 (9)(8) OTHER PRESCRIPTION DRUG OR DEVICE SERVICES.
92 Services, other than claims processing services, provided
93 directly or indirectly, whether in connection with or separate
94 from claims processing services, including, but not limited
95 to, any of the following:
96 a. Negotiating rebates with drug companies.
97 b. Disbursing or distributing rebates.
98 c. Managing or participating in incentive programs or
99 arrangements for pharmacist services.
100 d. Negotiating or entering into contractual
101 arrangements with pharmacists or pharmacies, or both.
102 e. Developing formularies.
103 f. Designing prescription benefit programs.
104 g. Advertising or promoting services.
105 (10)(9) PHARMACIST. As defined in Section 34-23-1.
106 (11)(10) PHARMACIST SERVICES. Products, goods, and
107 services, or any combination of products, goods, and services,
108 provided as a part of the practice of pharmacy.
109 (12)(11) PHARMACY. As defined in Section 34-23-1.
110 (13)(12) PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER. a. A person,
111 including a wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary
112 of a pharmacy benefits manager, that provides claims
Page 4

of a pharmacy benefits manager, that provides claims
SB345 INTRODUCED
113 processing services or other prescription drug or device
114 services, or both, to covered individuals who are employed in
115 or are residents of this state, for health benefit plans. The
116 term includes any person that administers a prescription
117 discount program directly for or on behalf of a pharmacy
118 benefits manager or health benefit plan for drugs to covered
119 individuals which are not reimbursed by a pharmacy benefits
120 manager or are not covered by a health benefit plan.
121 b. Pharmacy benefits manager does not include any of
122 the following:
123 1. A health care facility licensed in this state.
124 2. A health care professional licensed in this state.
125 3. A consultant who only provides advice as to the
126 selection or performance of a pharmacy benefits manager.
127 (14)(13) PRESCRIPTION DRUGS. Includes, but is not
128 limited to, certain infusion, compounded, and long-term care
129 prescription drugs. The term does not include specialty drugs.
130 (15)(14) REBATE. Any payments or price concessions that
131 accrue to a pharmacy benefits manager or its health benefit
132 plan client, directly or indirectly, including through its PBM
133 affiliate or its subsidiary, third party, or intermediary,
134 including an off-shore purchasing organization, from a
135 pharmaceutical manufacturer or its affiliate, subsidiary,
136 third party, or intermediary. The term includes, but is not
137 limited to, payments, discounts, administration fees, credits,
138 incentives, or penalties associated, directly or indirectly,
139 in any way with claims administered on behalf of a health
140 benefit plan.
Page 5

benefit plan.
SB345 INTRODUCED
141 (16)(15) SPECIALTY DRUGS. Prescription medications that
142 require special handling, administration, or monitoring and
143 are used for the treatment of patients with serious health
144 conditions requiring complex therapies, and that are eligible
145 for specialty tier placement by the Centers for Medicare and
146 Medicaid Services pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 423.560.
147 (17)(16) SPREAD PRICING. A prescription drug pricing
148 model used by a pharmacy benefits manager in which the
149 pharmacy benefits manager charges a health benefit plan a
150 contracted price for a prescription drug which is higher than
151 the amount the pharmacy benefits manager pays the pharmacy for
152 the prescription drug.
153 (18)(17) STEERING. The term includes all of the
154 following practices by a pharmacy benefits manager:
155 a. Directing, ordering, or requiring a covered
156 individual to use a specific pharmacy, including a PBM
157 affiliate pharmacy, for the purpose of filling a prescription
158 or receiving pharmacist services.
159 b. Inducing a covered individual to use a designated
160 pharmacy, including a PBM affiliate pharmacy, by increasing
161 costs to the health benefit plan or charging the covered
162 individual up to the full cost for a prescription drug if the
163 covered individual fails to use the pharmacy designated by the
164 pharmacy benefits manager.
165 c. Advertising, marketing, or promoting a pharmacy,
166 including a PBM affiliate pharmacy, over another in-network
167 pharmacy.
168 d. Engaging in any practice that results in excluding,
Page 6

d. Engaging in any practice that results in excluding,
SB345 INTRODUCED
169 restricting, or inhibiting an in-network pharmacy from
170 providing prescription drugs to beneficiaries under a health
171 benefit plan, which may involve, but not be limited to, the
172 use of credentialing or accreditation standards, day supply
173 limitations, or delivery method limitations.
174 e. Engaging in any practice aimed at directly or
175 indirectly influencing a pharmaceutical manufacturer to limit
176 its distribution of a prescription drug to certain pharmacies
177 or to restrict distribution of the drug to non-PBM affiliate
178 pharmacies.
179 (18) UNAFFILIATED PHARMACY. A pharmacy that is not a
180 PBM affiliate."
181 "§27-45A-10
182 With respect to a pharmacist or pharmacy, a pharmacy
183 benefits manager, directly or through an affiliate or a
184 contracted third party, may not do any of the following:
185 (1) Reimburse an in-network pharmacy or pharmacist in
186 the state an amount less than the amount that the pharmacy
187 benefits manager reimburses a similarly situated PBM affiliate
188 for providing the same pharmacist services to covered
189 individuals in the same health benefit plan.
190 (2) Practice spread pricing in this state unless
191 required under the health benefit plan. If spread pricing is
192 practiced pursuant to the health benefit plan, the pharmacy
193 benefits manager shall submit an annual report to the
194 commissioner which discloses the differences between the
195 amount the health benefit plan is charged and the amount
196 network pharmacies are reimbursed.
Page 7

network pharmacies are reimbursed.
SB345 INTRODUCED
197 (3) Deny a pharmacy or pharmacist the right to
198 participate as a network provider if the pharmacy or
199 pharmacist meets and agrees to the terms and conditions,
200 including reimbursements, in the pharmacy benefits manager's
201 contract, including an independentunaffiliated pharmacy that
202 qualifies for reimbursement at the minimum rate established in
203 Section 27-45A-13(a)(1), notwithstanding any term to the
204 contrary in the pharmacy benefits manager's contract.
205 (4) Impose credentialing standards on a pharmacist or
206 pharmacy beyond or more onerous than the licensing standards
207 set by the Alabama State Board of Pharmacy or charge a
208 pharmacy or pharmacist any fee in regard to, without
209 limitation, network enrollment, network participation,
210 credentialing or recredentialing, change of ownership,
211 submission of claims, transmission of claims, adjudication of
212 claims, claims processed through discount card programs, or
213 otherwise, if not in conjunction with an audit conducted
214 pursuant to Article 8, Chapter 23, Title 34;, provided,
215 however, this subdivision shall not prohibit a pharmacy
216 benefits manager from setting minimum requirements for
217 participating in a pharmacy network.
218 (5) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from providing a
219 covered individual with any relevant information about a
220 prescription drug, including the following:
221 a. The cost and reimbursement amount of the drug.
222 b. An alternative drug.
223 c. Any other information considered to be necessary in
224 the professional judgment of the pharmacist.
Page 8

the professional judgment of the pharmacist.
SB345 INTRODUCED
225 (6) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from offering and
226 providing delivery services to a covered individual as an
227 ancillary service of the pharmacy, provided all of the
228 following requirements are met:
229 a. The pharmacist or pharmacy can demonstrate quality,
230 stability, and safety standards during delivery.
231 b. The pharmacist or pharmacy does not charge any
232 delivery or service fee to a pharmacy benefits manager or
233 health insurer.
234 c. The pharmacist or pharmacy alerts the covered
235 individual that he or she will be responsible for any delivery
236 service fee associated with the delivery service, and that the
237 pharmacy benefits manager or health insurer will not reimburse
238 the delivery service fee.
239 (7) Charge or hold a pharmacist or pharmacy responsible
240 for a fee or penalty relating to an audit conducted pursuant
241 to Article 8, Chapter 23, Title 34, provided this prohibition
242 does not restrict recoupments made in accordance with the
243 Pharmacy Audit Integrity Act.
244 (8) Charge a pharmacist or pharmacy a point-of-sale or
245 retroactive fee or otherwise recoup funds from a pharmacy in
246 connection with claims for which the pharmacy has already been
247 paid, unless the recoupment is made pursuant to an audit
248 conducted in accordance with Article 8, Chapter 23, Title 34.
249 (9) Except for a drug reimbursed, directly or
250 indirectly, by the Medicaid program, vary the amount a
251 pharmacy benefits manager reimburses an entity for a drug,
252 including each and every prescription medication that is
Page 9

including each and every prescription medication that is
SB345 INTRODUCED
253 eligible for specialty tier placement by the Centers for
254 Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to 42 C.F.R. §
255 423.560, regardless of any provision of law to the contrary,
256 on the basis of whether:
257 a. The drug is subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.
258 § 256b; or
259 b. The entity participates in the program set forth in
260 42 U.S.C. § 256b.
261 (10) If an entity participates, directly or indirectly,
262 in the program set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 256b, do any of the
263 following:
264 a. Assess a fee, charge-back, or other adjustment on
265 the entity.
266 b. Restrict access to the pharmacy benefits manager's
267 pharmacy network.
268 c. Require the entity to enter into a contract with a
269 specific pharmacy to participate in the pharmacy benefits
270 manager's pharmacy network.
271 d. Create a restriction or an additional charge on a
272 patient who chooses to receive drugs from the entity.
273 e. Create any additional requirements or restrictions
274 on the entity.
275 (11) Require a claim for a drug to include a modifier
276 to indicate that the drug is subject to an agreement under 42
277 U.S.C. § 256b.
278 (12) Penalize or retaliate against a pharmacist or
279 pharmacy for exercising rights under this chapter or Article
280 8, Chapter 23, Title 34. For purposes of this subdivision, the
Page 10

8, Chapter 23, Title 34. For purposes of this subdivision, the
SB345 INTRODUCED
281 conduct prohibited includes any written or verbal
282 communication that a reasonable individual would construe as a
283 threat of penalty or retaliation received before or in the
284 course of exercising rights under this chapter or Article 8,
285 Chapter 23, Title 34.
286 (13) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from declining
287 to dispense a drug to a covered individual, or directing a
288 covered individual to another pharmacy, if the reimbursement
289 amount would be lower than the dispensing cost of the
290 pharmacist or pharmacy.
291 (14) Take retaliatory action against, or impose any
292 penalty on, a pharmacist or pharmacy who declines to dispense
293 a drug to a covered individual under subdivision (13),
294 including cancellation or nonrenewal of a contract, or suit
295 for breach of contract."
296 "§27-45A-13
297 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter
298 or any form of a contract to the contrary, with respect to an
299 independentunaffiliated pharmacy, a pharmacy benefits manager,
300 directly or through an affiliate or a contracted third party,
301 may not do any of the following:
302 (1) Reimburse for dispensing a prescription drug in an
303 amount that is less than the Medicaid reimbursement rate.
304 (2) Impose a fee or otherwise adjust or lower the
305 reimbursement of a drug at the time the claim is adjudicated,
306 or after the claim is adjudicated, that in any way reduces the
307 amount of reimbursement for the drug as regulated pursuant to
308 subdivision (1).
Page 11

subdivision (1).
SB345 INTRODUCED
309 (3) Increase a covered individual's cost-sharing
310 percentage or ratio at or after the point of sale by raising
311 the deductible, copayment, or coinsurance, or by requiring any
312 other out-of-pocket payment as a means to recoup the
313 dispensing cost portion of the reimbursement required pursuant
314 to subdivision (1).
315 (4) Reject payment of a claim for a drug that is
316 submitted by an independentunaffiliated pharmacy when the drug
317 is available to a covered individual at a different in-network
318 pharmacy; provided, however, if the drug is dispensed by the
319 different in-network pharmacy, the pharmacy benefits manager
320 shall pay the independentunaffiliated pharmacy a surcharge
321 equal to the reimbursement that would have been paid pursuant
322 to subdivision (1) had the independentunaffiliated pharmacy
323 dispensed the drug.
324 (b) A health benefit plan that covers individuals who
325 are public employees and that reimburses
326 independentunaffiliated pharmacies for dispensing prescription
327 drugs during its plan year in an aggregate amount that is
328 higher than would otherwise be calculated using the rate set
329 in subdivision (a)(1), upon proof of the same submitted to the
330 commissioner, shall be exempt from this section.
331 Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
332 2026.
Page 12